Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2703
Foreign trade zones; select and describe locations.

Any private corporation or public corporation may select and describe the location of the foreign trade zones or foreign trade subzones for which an application is made, and make such rules and regulations concerning the establishment, operation and maintenance of the foreign trade zones or foreign trade subzones as may be necessary to comply with the Act of Congress or as may be necessary to comply with the rules and regulations made in accordance with the Act of Congress.

Laws 1973, LB 387, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 21-20,147.